Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4819.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 82. (1) The office of secretary of state or attorney general shall become becomes vacant upon on the happening of any of the following events: Death of the incumbent; his (a) The incumbent's death. (b) The incumbent's resignation. ; his (c) The incumbent's removal from office for cause. ; his (d) The incumbent's ceasing to be a resident of the this state. ; his (e) The incumbent's conviction of an infamous crime or an offense involving the violation of his the incumbent's oath of office. ; the (f) The decision of a competent tribunal declaring his the incumbent's election or appointment void. ; or his (g) The incumbent's neglect or refusal to take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office and deposit the same oath of office in the manner and within the time prescribed by law. When (2) In addition to subsection (1), the office of secretary of state becomes vacant if the incumbent secretary of state files a nominating petition or filing fee for, is nominated to, or is appointed to, any other elected or appointed public office. (3) Not later than 10 days after a vacancy shall occur occurs in any of the said offices, the office of secretary of state or attorney general, a notice of such the vacancy and the reason why the same vacancy exists shall, within 10 days after such vacancy occurs, must be given in writing to the governor. Such The notice shall must be given by the secretary of state unless such the vacancy occurs in the office of the secretary of state, then by the attorney general.